New York, session 2025-2026, A6129.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2803-bb to read as follows: 3 § 2803-bb. Disclosure of charitable programs. All hospitals organized 4 pursuant to the not-for-profit corporation law or which meets the quali- 5 fications of section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code shall: 6 (a) disclose to all patients and any patient's authorized represen- 7 tative that such hospital has charitable programs for low and moderate- 8 income persons to help with medical bills including, but not limited to, 9 the charitable programs information and contact information regarding 10 such programs. 11 (b) post conspicuously on such hospital's website, lobby areas, and 12 other areas where patients could view the post that such hospital has 13 charitable programs for low and moderate-income persons to help with 14 medical bills including, but not limited to, the charitable programs 15 information and contact information regarding such programs. 16 (c) post conspicuously on the first page of any medical bill issued by 17 such hospital and on any intake document, including electronic, digital 18 or any other method used by such hospital for such documents, in the 19 same font size and format as such bill or intake document, as applica- 20 ble, a notice that such hospital has charitable programs for low and 21 moderate-income persons to help with medical bills including, but not 22 limited to, the charitable programs information and contact information 23 regarding such programs. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10210-01-5 A. 6129 2 1 (d) inform all social workers in such hospital that such hospital has 2 charitable programs for low and moderate-income persons to help with 3 medical bills including, but not limited to, the charitable programs 4 information and contact information regarding such programs and such 5 social workers shall disclose such information. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 7 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 8 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 9 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 10 completed on or before such effective date.